Arkansas, session 2025, SB100.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 77, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-77-154. Primary care provider for Arkansas Medicaid Program —
Physician assistant.
(a) If authorized by a physician assistant’s supervising physician,
the Arkansas Medicaid Program shall recognize a physician assistant licensed
by the Arkansas State Medical Board as a primary care provider authorized to
carry out the following duties of a primary care case manager:
(1) Being recognized and serving as the initial healthcare
provider in the program; and
(2) Treating a patient within the scope of practice and
licensure of a physician assistant under § 17-105-107.
(b) The program shall reimburse a physician assistant:
(1) Not less than the current reimbursement rate for services
performed within the scope of practice and licensure of the physician
assistant; and
*JMB016*
02-25-2025 10:36:46 JMB016

As Engrossed: S2/25/25 SB100
(2) One hundred percent (100%) of the physician reimbursement
rate for all out-of-pocket costs incurred by the physician assistant such as
the costs of laboratory tests, X-rays, and any additional tests ordered or
conducted by the physician assistant.
(c) A healthcare insurance policy in which the premiums are paid
directly or indirectly by the program also shall recognize and reimburse a
physician assistant under subsections (a) and (b) of this section.
(d) This section does not increase the scope of practice or licensure
of a physician assistant.
(e) When initially applying to the program to be recognized as a
primary care provider and case manager under this section, a physician
assistant shall provide a written authorization that is signed and dated by
his or her supervising physician.

/s/C. Penzo





















02-25-2025 10:36:46 JMB016